Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7932.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-17 of the General Laws entitled "Licensing of Healthcare
Facilities" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-17-54.1. Protection of American sign language interpreter services.
(a) No reduction without approval. No hospital, freestanding emergency-care facility, state
agency, or other entity providing public services shall reduce the number, availability, or hours of
American Sign Language (ASL) interpreter services required under state or federal law, including
§§ 23-17-54 and 8-5-8, without the prior written approval of the Rhode Island commission on the
deaf and hard of hearing (RICDHH).
(b) Commission review. The RICDHH shall review any proposed reduction to ensure that
the reduction will not impair meaningful communication access for individuals who are deaf, hard
of hearing, or deaf-blind.
(c) Approval criteria. In granting approval, the RICDHH shall consider:
(1) Current and projected need for ASL interpreter services in the affected setting;
(2) The availability of qualified interpreters;
(3) Any proposed alternative communication methods; and
(4) Compliance with federal and state accessibility laws.
(d) Enforcement. Any reduction of ASL interpreter services without RICDHH approval
shall constitute a violation of licensure, certification, or program compliance requirements, as
applicable, and may result in administrative penalties, including fines, suspension, or revocation of

licensure or program authorization.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005822
========
LC005822 - Page 2 of 3